Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-550
Register and roster of applicants and abstracters.

The board shall keep a register of the name of each applicant for certification, with his or her place of business and such other information as may be deemed appropriate, including a notation of the action taken by the board thereon, the date upon which the certificate of registration or certificate of authority is issued, and the date of renewal of such certificates. The board shall maintain other records, registers, and files as may be necessary for the proper administration of its duties pursuant to the Abstracters Act. A roster showing the names and places of business of abstracters holding an operative certificate of registration shall be prepared by the director and maintained and updated at least annually on the board's web site in a printable format.

Laws 1965, c. 453, § 7, p. 1439;

Laws 1981, LB 409, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-515;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB1051, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB269, § 1.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).